Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 8. Point System for Commercial Fishing Violations in Salmon Fisheries.

Sec. 16.43.850.
Point system.

For the purpose of identifying frequent violators of commercial fishing laws in salmon fisheries, the commission shall adopt regulations establishing a uniform system for the suspension of commercial salmon fishing privileges by assigning demerit points for convictions for violations of commercial fishing laws in salmon fisheries that are reported to the commission under AS

16.43.880

. The commission shall assess demerit points against a permit holder for each violation of commercial fishing laws in a salmon fishery in accordance with (b) and (c) of this section. The commission shall assess points against a permit holder for the salmon fishery in which the violation of commercial fishing laws occurred.

The commission shall assess demerit points against a permit holder for a conviction of a violation of commercial fishing laws in a salmon fishery under AS

16.05.722

,

16.05.723

,

16.05.831

; AS

16.10.055

,

16.10.070

—

16.10.090

,

16.10.100

,

16.10.110

,

16.10.120

,

16.10.200

—

16.10.220

, and

16.10.760

—

16.10.790

for the following violations in accordance with this schedule:

fishing in closed waters . . . . . 6 points;

fishing during closed season or period . . . . . 6 points;.

fishing with more than the legal amount of gear . . . . . 4 points;

fishing with gear not allowed in fishery . . . . . 6 points;

fishing before expiration of transfer period . . . . . 6 points;

interfering with commercial fishing gear . . . . . 4 points;

fishing with more than the legal amount of gear on vessel . . . . . 4 points;

improper operation of fishing gear . . . . . 4 points;

permit holder not present when required . . . . . 4 points;

fishing with underlength or overlength vessel . . . . . 6 points;

wanton waste of fishery resources . . . . . 4 points.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, if a permit holder’s first conviction of a violation of commercial fishing laws in a salmon fishery in a 36-month period is a conviction under AS

16.05.722

, the number of demerit points assessed against the permit holder for the violation must be one-half of the points assessed for the violation under (b) of this section.

The commission shall suspend a permit holder’s commercial salmon fishing privileges for a salmon fishery for a period of

one year if the permit holder accumulates 12 or more points during any consecutive 36-month period as a result of convictions for violations of commercial fishing laws in the salmon fishery;

two years if the permit holder accumulates 16 or more points during any consecutive 36-month period as a result of convictions for violations of commercial fishing laws in the salmon fishery;

three years if the permit holder accumulates 18 or more points during any consecutive 36-month period as a result of convictions for violations of commercial fishing laws in the salmon fishery.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1998)

Sec. 16.43.855.
Assessment of points.

Notice of each assessment of points shall be given to the permit holder. Notice shall also be given to the permit holder before the expiration of a suspension of commercial salmon fishing privileges under AS

16.43.850(d)

that subsequent violations of commercial fishing laws in the salmon fishery may result in further suspensions of the permit. The notice may be given by first class mail.

The time periods provided for in AS

16.43.850

for the accumulation of points shall be based on the date of conviction, either on a plea of guilty, nolo contendere, or a forfeiture of bail or collateral, or as a result of a trial, for violation of a commercial salmon fishing law.

The assessment of points against a permit holder by the commission under AS

16.43.850

—

16.43.895

is in addition to, and not in substitution for, other provisions of this title and is not a substitute for any penalty imposed by a court.

If points are assessed against a permit holder who holds a commercial fishing permit for a salmon fishery under an emergency transfer approved by the commission under AS

16.43.180

, the same number of points shall also be assessed against the transferor of the permit. Points assessed against the transferor of the permit under this subsection shall be included in calculations made under AS

16.43.850(d)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1998)

Sec. 16.43.860.
Suspension.

A permit holder whose commercial salmon fishing privileges for a salmon fishery are suspended under AS

16.43.850

—

16.43.895

may not obtain an entry permit or interim-use permit for that salmon fishery during the period of the suspension of the privileges. During the period for which the permit holder’s privilege to obtain an entry permit or interim-use permit for a salmon fishery is suspended under this section, the commission may not issue a permit card to the permit holder for that fishery.

A permit holder whose privilege of obtaining a commercial fishing permit for a salmon fishery is suspended under AS

16.43.850

—

16.43.895

may not

engage in the salmon fishery under a crewmember license; or

lease or rent the permit holder’s interest in a boat to another person if the boat would be used in the salmon fishery for which the permit holder’s fishing privileges are suspended.

If, during the period for which a permit holder’s commercial fishing privileges for a salmon fishery are suspended, the commission establishes a limited entry system for the salmon fishery, the permit holder shall be eligible to obtain an entry permit for that fishery to the extent that the permit holder qualifies for the entry permit under regulations adopted by the commission. If the permit holder qualifies for an entry permit for the fishery, the commission shall withhold issuance of the entry permit until the period of the suspension imposed under AS

16.43.850

—

16.43.895

has expired.

The commission may not transfer a commercial fishing permit for a salmon fishery under an emergency transfer under AS

16.43.180

if, at the time of the application for the emergency transfer, the permit holder’s commercial salmon fishing privileges for the salmon fishery have been suspended.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1998)

Sec. 16.43.870.
Notice and appeal.

The commission shall provide notice of determinations of the commission under AS

16.43.850

—

16.43.895

. Respondents may request a hearing under regulations adopted by the commission under AS

16.43.110

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1998)

Sec. 16.43.880.
Required notice to commission.

A court that convicts a person of a violation of commercial fishing laws under this title or under a regulation adopted under this title in a salmon fishery shall forward a record of the conviction to the commission on a weekly basis.

A conviction on a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court or a forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure a defendant’s appearance in court that has not been vacated, or as a result of trial, is a conviction for purposes of AS

16.43.850

—

16.43.895

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1998)

Sec. 16.43.895.
Definitions for AS 16.43.850 — 16.43.895.

In AS

16.43.850

—

16.43.895

,

“commercial fishing law” means a statute or regulation that regulates the conduct of a person engaged in commercial fishing activities by establishing requirements relating to fishing licenses and permits; catch records and reports; size, nature, quantity, or use of fishing vessels, sites, and gear; time, place, or manner of taking fishery resources; possession, transportation, sale, barter, or waste of fishery resources; or other aspects of commercial fishing;

“commercial fishing permit” means an entry permit or an interim-use permit issued under this chapter;

“commercial salmon fishing privileges” means the privilege of participating in an activity for which a commercial fishing permit to take salmon is required and the privilege of obtaining a commercial fishing permit to take salmon;

“permit holder” includes the holder of a commercial fishing permit as the result of an emergency transfer, an applicant for a commercial fishing permit if the applicant’s commercial fishing permit was suspended under AS

16.43.850

—

16.43.895

, and a person whose privilege of obtaining a commercial fishing permit for a fishery is suspended under AS

16.43.850

—

16.43.895

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1998)

Sec. 16.43.901.
Vessel permits. [Repealed, § 5 ch. 126 SLA 1996.]

Secs. 16.43.906,
16.43.911.
Vessel permits for weathervane scallop fishery; applicability of other statutes. [Repealed, § 6 ch 97 SLA 1997.]